Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2239
Department, defined.

Department means the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 882;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 4.